Washington statutes.
RCW 9.38.015

False statement by deposit account applicant.

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor for a deposit account applicant to knowingly make any false statement to a financial institution regarding:

(a) The applicant's identity;

(b) Past convictions for crimes involving fraud or deception; or

(c) Outstanding judgments on checks or drafts issued by the applicant.

(2) Each violation of subsection (1) of this section after the third violation is a class C felony punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1995 c 186 s 4.]